North Dakota, session 69, HB1353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 57-15 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Limitation on levies by taxing districts without voter approval.
1. a. Notwithstanding that a taxing district may have unused or excess levy authority
under any other provision of law, this section supersedes and limits that authority.
This section may not be interpreted as authority to increase any property tax levy
authority otherwise provided by law and must be applied to limit any property tax
levy authority to which a taxing district may otherwise be entitled. Property taxes
levied in dollars by a taxing district may not exceed the amount the taxing district
levied in dollars in the preceding taxable year by more than the consumer price
index, but not to exceed three percent, except:
(1) When property and improvements to property which were not taxable in the
preceding taxable year are taxable in the current year, the amount levied in
dollars in the preceding taxable year by the taxing district must be increased
for purposes of this section to reflect the taxes that would have been
imposed against the additional taxable valuation attributable to that property
at the mill rate applied to all property in the preceding taxable year.
(2) When a property tax exemption existed in the preceding taxable year which
has been reduced or no longer exists for the current taxable year, the
amount levied in dollars in the preceding taxable year by the taxing district
Page No. 1 25.0525.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
must be increased for purposes of this section to reflect the taxes that would
have been imposed against the portion of the taxable valuation of the
property which is no longer exempt at the mill rate applied to all property in
the preceding taxable year.
(3) When property that was taxable in the preceding taxable year is not taxable
for the current taxable year, the amount levied in dollars in the preceding
taxable year by the taxing district must be reduced for purposes of this
section by the amount of taxes that were imposed against the taxable
valuation of that property in the preceding taxable year.
(4) When a temporary mill levy increase, excluding an increase under this
section, authorized by the electors of the taxing district or mill levy
imposition authority under state law existed in the preceding taxable year
but is no longer applicable or has been reduced, the amount levied in
dollars in the preceding taxable year by the taxing district must be adjusted
to reflect the expired temporary mill levy increase and the eliminated or
reduced mill levy under state law before the percentage increase allowable
under this subsection is applied.
b. If the actual percentage increase in property taxes levied in dollars by a taxing
district compared to the property taxes levied in the preceding taxable year is
less than the percentage increase limitation under subdivision a, the taxing
district may carry forward the excess percentage increase to any of the three
succeeding taxable years up to a combined total of an amount equal to double
the percentage increase limitation under subdivision a in any one taxable year .
The taxing district may not accumulate unused excess percentage increases
beyond the three taxable year period and the unused excess percentage
increase must be used in the order it was accumulated. Excess percentage
increases may not be used to increase the percentage increase limitation under
subdivision a more than once .
2. The limitation on the total amount levied by a taxing district under subsection 1 does
not apply to:
Page No. 2 25.0525.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. New or increased property tax levy authority that was not available to the taxing
district in the preceding taxable year, including property tax levy authority
provided by state law or approved by the electors of the taxing district.
b. Any irrepealable tax to pay bonded indebtedness levied under section 16 o f
article X of the Constitution of North Dakota. Any tax levied for this purpose mus t
be excluded from the mill rate applied under paragraphs 1 through 3 o f
subdivision a of subsection 1 .
c. The one - mill levy for the state medical center authorized by section 10 of article X
of the Constitution of North Dakota. Any tax levied for this purpose must be
excluded from the mill rate applied under paragraphs 1 through 3 of subdivision a
of subsection 1 .
d. The levy, not to exceed one mill, for the Garrison Diversion Conservancy District,
authorized by section 57 - 15 - 26.8 .
e. Taxes or special assessments levied to pay the principal and interest on any
obligations of any political subdivision, including taxes levied for deficiencies in
special assessment and improvement district funds and revenue bond and
reserve funds.
f. Taxes levied pursuant to law for the proportion of the cost to any taxing district for
a special improvement project by general taxation.
g. Taxes levied under sections 40 - 24 - 10, 40 - 43 - 01, and 57 - 15 - 41 , and chapter
61 - 16.1 .
3. A levy exceeding the percentage increase limitation under subsection 1 may be
imposed upon approval of a ballot measure, stating the percentage of the proposed
property tax levy increase percentage compared to the percentage limitation under
subsection 1, by at least sixty percent of the qualified electors of the taxing distric t
voting on the question at a statewide primary or general election . A levy exceeding the
percentage increase limitation under subsection 1 may be approved by electors for no t
more than one taxable year at a time.
4. A city or county may not supersede or modify the application of this section under
home rule authority.
5. For purposes of this section:
Page No. 3 25.0525.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
a. "Consumer price index" means the percentage change in the consumer price
index for all urban consumers in the midwest region as determined by the United
States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, for the most recent year
ending December thirty-first.
b. "Excess percentage increase" means the difference between the percentage
increase limitation under subdivision a of subsection 1 for a taxable year and the
actual percentage increase in property taxes levied in dollars by a taxing district
in the taxable year compared to the preceding taxable year.
c. "Taxing district" means any political subdivision empowered to levy taxes.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 4 25.0525.02000